Utah statutes.
26-18a-1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Children" or "child" means a person under the age of 18.
(2)  "Committee" means the Kurt Oscarson Children's Organ Transplant
Coordinating Committee.
(3)  " Restricted account" means the Kurt Oscarson Children's Organ Transplant
Account created in Section 26-18a-4.
